Colorado statutes. TITLE 27 Behavioral Health
ARTICLE 50
BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SYSTEM MONITORING

PART 3 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SAFETY NET SYSTEM

PART 4 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES ORGANIZATIONS

PART 5 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ENTITIES

PART 6 NETWORK STANDARDS

PART 7 BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION ADVISORY COUNCIL

PART 8 MENTAL HEALTH PROGRAMS